Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3528
Violations; person aggrieved; remedies.

Whenever any officer or employee of the state, its agencies, or its political subdivisions, or whenever any state agency or any political subdivision or its agencies fails to comply with the requirements of sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423 or of regulations lawfully adopted to implement sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423, any person aggrieved may bring an action, including but not limited to an action for mandamus, to compel compliance and such action may be brought in the district court of any district in which the records involved are located or in the district court of Lancaster County. The commission may request the Attorney General to bring such action.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 31.

This section does not either expressly or by overwhelming implication waive sovereign immunity for actions brought against a state agency seeking compliance with the Criminal History Information Act. State ex rel. Rhiley v. Nebraska State Patrol, 301 Neb. 241, 917 N.W.2d 903 (2018).

This section authorizes an aggrieved individual to bring an action, not to file a motion in the criminal case the record of which he or she seeks to seal pursuant to section 29-3523. An "action" is a distinct and separate court proceeding, governed by separate pleadings and requiring separate process. State v. Coble, 299 Neb. 434, 908 N.W.2d 646 (2018).

This section provides a procedure for enforcing the privacy protections of the Security, Privacy, and Dissemination of Criminal History Information Act (including section 29-3523). State v. Coble, 299 Neb. 434, 908 N.W.2d 646 (2018).